Tennessee, session 114, HB1164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 8, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Decorations or medals from the armed forces of the United States, the
Tennessee national guard, or the state guard, or any service medals or badges awarded
to the members of such forces, may be worn by uniformed law enforcement personnel
during the week prior to Veterans Day and Memorial Day, the day of Veterans Day and
Memorial Day, and the day immediately following Veterans Day and Memorial Day.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the employer of the uniformed law
enforcement personnel may prohibit the wearing of military decorations pursuant to this
section if the employer determines that wearing the military decorations poses a safety
hazard to the uniformed law enforcement personnel or to the public.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1164
002325
- 1 -